Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.900

Preexisting liabilities not affected.

The enactment of this act shall not have the effect of terminating, or in any way modifying, any liability, civil or criminal, which shall already be in existence on the date this act becomes effective.

[ 1961 c 249 s 31.]